Arkansas, session 2025, HB1790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-111. Local government regulation of short-term rentals ——
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Effectively prohibit" means an act or failure to act by the
governing body of a local government that prevents a property owner, lodging
operator, or tenant from using property as a short-term rental after
compliance with generally applicable federal, state, or local laws and with
any laws, rules, or regulations allowed by this section;
(2) “Local government” means a county, city of the first class,
city of the second class, or an incorporated town;
(3)(A) “Short-term rental” means a residence that is rented or
offered for rent for a period of thirty (30) days or less in exchange for a
fee.
(B) "Short-term rental" does not include any property that
*SSS255*
04-03-2025 10:55:47 SSS255

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1790
is used:
(i) For retail;
(ii) As a restaurant;
(iii) As banquet space;
(iv) As an event center;
(v) For any other similar use under subdivisions
(a)(3)(B)(i) — (iv) of this section; or
(vi) As an owner-occupied residence in which a
portion of the residence is rented; and
(4) "Short-term rental marketplace" means a person who provides
a platform through which a property owner, lodging operator, or tenant, or
the authorized agent of the property owner, lodging operator, or tenant,
offers a short-term rental to an occupant.
(b) A local government shall not:
(1) Effectively prohibit the use of property as a short-term
rental;
(2) Impose a rule or regulation creating a jurisdiction wide ban
on the use of properties as short-term rentals; or
(3) Impose a rule or regulation creating a jurisdiction wide
numerical limit on the use of properties as short-term rentals.
(c) A local government may adopt and enforce an ordinance requiring a
permit to operate a short-term rental that may require:
(1) A permit fee;
(2) The identity of the short-term rental owner or owners, any
registered agent for the short-term rental, and any property manager of the
short-term rental;
(3) The address of the short-term rental;
(4) The current contact information of the short-term rental
owner or owners, any registered agent for the short-term rental, and any
property manager of the short-term rental;
(5) The posting of applicable safety and emergency contact
information in any unit leased as a short-term rental; and
(6) The collection and remittance of any applicable sales and
use tax and any advertising and promotion tax under § 26-75-601 et seq.
(d)(1) A permit issued under subsection (c) of this section may be
revoked or suspended by the governing body of the local government for twelve
04-03-2025 10:55:47 SSS255

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1790
(12) months after three (3) violations of a local ordinance in a twelve-month
period occurring at the short-term rental location due to the actions of the
owner, permit holder, or an occupant of the short-term rental.
(2) A permit issued under subsection (c) of this section may be
revoked or suspended by the governing body of the local government for
twenty-four (24) months after a state or federal felonious criminal act has
occurred at the short-term rental location, and the felonious criminal act
was committed by the owner, permit holder, or an occupant of the short-term
rental.
(3)(A) A permit issued under subsection (c) of this section may
be revoked or suspended for failure to comply with generally applicable
federal, state, or local laws and with any rules or regulations allowed by
this section.
(B) Any revocation or suspension under subdivision
(d)(3)(A) of this section shall last only until the short-term operator
complies with generally applicable federal, state, or local laws and with any
rules or regulations allowed by this section.
(e) A local government may enforce all health and safety codes adopted
by the local government and the state including without limitation the
following codes applicable to the operation of a short-term rental:
(1) Fire codes;
(2) Building codes;
(3) Plumbing codes;
(4) Sanitation codes; and
(5) Electrical codes.
(f) A short-term rental:
(1) Shall be classified as residential land use for zoning
purposes;
(2) Shall be subject to the zoning requirements of the
residential zone where the short-term rental is located; and
(3) May be a permitted use in a commercial zone.
(g) This section does not supersede:
(1) An agreement between a homeowners' association and a
homeowner;
(2) A valid deed restriction; or
(3) A covenant.
04-03-2025 10:55:47 SSS255

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1790
(h) This section shall not limit the initiative powers of the people
under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1, to enact any regulation,
restriction, limitation, or prohibition on short-term rentals.

/s/B. McKenzie































04-03-2025 10:55:47 SSS255